Idaho, session 2025, H0031.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 56-209b, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
56-209b. MEDICAL ASSISTANCE -- MEDICAL ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT. (1) Medi-
cal assistance shall be awarded to persons as mandated by federal law;, and
medical assistance may be awarded to such other persons not required to be
awarded medical assistance as mandated by federal law when such award is to
the fiscal advantage of the state of Idaho.
(2) There is hereby created in the dedicated fund the medical assis-
tance account. The medical assistance account shall be an entity primarily
designed to receive moneys from the families and relatives of patients re-
ceiving medical assistance under the state plan for medicaid, and to pro-
vide a source of moneys to pay for the state's share of medical assistance ex-
penses. Moneys in the medical assistance account may not be commingled with
moneys in the cooperative welfare account fund. Moneys in the medical as-
sistance account must be appropriated in order to be expended to pay for the
state's share of medical assistance expenses.
(3) In all cases where the department of health and welfare through the
medical assistance program has or will be required to pay medical expenses
for a recipient and that recipient is entitled to recover any or all such med-
ical expenses from any third party or entity, the department of health and
welfare will be subrogated to the rights of the recipient to the extent of the
amount of medical assistance benefits paid by the department as the result of
the occurrence giving rise to the claim against the third party or entity.
(4) If a recipient of medical assistance pursues a claim against a third
party or entity through litigation or a settlement, the recipient will so no-
tify the department. If a recipient fails to notify the department of such
claim, the department may recover the amount of any public assistance ob-
tained by the recipient while the recipient pursued such claim. In addition,
if the recipient recovers funds, either by settlement or judgment, from such
a third party or entity, the recipient shall reimburse the department to the
extent of the funds received in settlement, minus attorney's fees and costs,
the amount of the medical assistance benefits paid by the department on his
behalf as a result of the occurrence giving rise to the need for medical as-
sistance. The department shall be entitled to all the legal rights and pow-
ers of a creditor against a debtor in enforcing the recipient's reimburse-
ment obligation.


(5) The department shall have priority to any amount received from
a third party or entity which that can reasonably be construed to compen-
sate the recipient for the occurrence giving rise to the need for medical
assistance, whether the settlement or judgment is obtained through the sub-
rogation right of the department or through recovery by the recipient, and
whether or not the recipient is made whole by the amount recovered. The de-
partment will be entitled to reimbursement of medical assistance benefits
paid on behalf of the recipient arising from the incident or occurrence prior
to any amount being distributed to the recipient. The department may notify
such third party or entity of the department's entitlement to receive the
reimbursement prior to any amount being distributed to the recipient. Fur-
thermore, the department may instruct the third party or entity to make such
payment directly to the department prior to any amount being distributed to
the recipient. Any third party or entity who distributed funds in violation
of such a notice shall be liable to the department for the amount of the re-
imbursement.
(6) In the event a recipient of assistance through the medical assis-
tance program incurs the obligation to pay attorney's fees and costs for the
purpose of enforcing a monetary claim to which the department has a right
under this section, the amount which that the department is entitled to re-
cover, or any lesser amount which that the department may agree to accept in
compromise of its claim, shall be reduced by an amount which that bears the
same relation to the total amount of attorney's fees and costs actually paid
by the recipient as the amount actually recovered for medical expenses paid
by the department, exclusive of the reduction for attorney's fees and costs,
bears to the total amount paid by the third party or entity to the recipient.
If a settlement or judgment is received by the recipient without delineating
what portion of the settlement or judgment is in payment of medical expenses,
it will be presumed that the settlement or judgment applies first to the med-
ical expenses incurred by the recipient in an amount equal to the expenditure
for medical assistance benefits paid by the department as a result of the oc-
currence giving rise to the payment or payments to the recipient.
(7) If a responsible third party requires prior authorization for an
item or service provided to a recipient of medical assistance, the respon-
sible third party shall accept an authorization provided by the department
that such item or service is covered under the state plan or applicable
waiver as if such authorization was made by the third party for the item or
service.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.